Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5347.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 167. (1) The department in cooperation with the department of health and human services shall develop plans to assist districts, intermediate districts, and local county health departments to comply with section 1177 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1177, and section 9209 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9209, for each school year. (2) Each district or intermediate district shall report to the local health department in which it is located by November 1 of each fiscal year, in a manner prescribed by the department of health and human services, the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through to 12 who enrolled in the district or intermediate district for the first time or who enrolled in grade 7 in the district or intermediate district for the first time, between January 1 and September 30 of the immediately preceding fiscal year. Not later than December 31 of each fiscal year, the department of health and human services shall notify the department by district or intermediate district of the percentage of entering pupils and of pupils who enrolled in grade 7 for the first time who do not have a completed, waived, or provisional immunization record in accordance are not in compliance with section 1177 1177(1) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1177. If a district or intermediate district does not have a completed, waived, or provisional immunization record signed statement or completed form in accordance with section 1177 1177(1) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1177, for at least 90% of the district's or intermediate district's entering pupils, as recorded in the November 1 reports required under this subsection, the district or intermediate district is subject to subsection (4) until the district or intermediate district has such an immunization record a statement or form for at least 90% of its pupils who enrolled in the district or intermediate district for the first time. All information reported under this subsection must be deidentified and aggregated. (3) Each district or intermediate district shall again report to the local health department in which it is located by February 1 of each fiscal year, in a manner prescribed by the department of health and human services, the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through to 12 who enrolled in the district or intermediate district for the first time or who enrolled in grade 7 in the district or intermediate district for the first time, between January 1 of the immediately preceding fiscal year and December 31 of the current fiscal year. Not later than March 31 of each fiscal year, the department of health and human services shall notify the department by district or intermediate district of the percentage of entering pupils and of pupils who enrolled in grade 7 for the first time who do not have a completed, waived, or provisional immunization record in accordance are not in compliance with section 1177 1177(1) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1177. If a district or intermediate district does not have a completed, waived, or provisional immunization record signed statement or completed form in accordance with section 1177 1177(1) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1177, for at least 95% of the district's or intermediate district's entering pupils, as recorded in the February 1 reports required under this subsection, the district or intermediate district is subject to subsection (4) until the district or intermediate district has such an immunization record a statement or form for at least 95% of its pupils who enrolled in the district or intermediate district for the first time. If the department of health and human services is not able to report to the department by March 31 because a district or intermediate district fails to submit a report as required in this subsection, or submits an incomplete, inaccurate, or late report, the district or intermediate district is subject to subsection (4) until the report is submitted in a complete and accurate form. All information reported under this subsection must be deidentified and aggregated. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if If a district or intermediate district does not comply with this section, the department shall withhold 5% of the total funds due to the district or intermediate district under this act after the date the department of health and human services reports a district's or intermediate district's noncompliance with this section to the department until the district or intermediate district complies with this section. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if If the district or intermediate district does not comply with this section by the end of the fiscal year, the district or intermediate district forfeits the total amount withheld. For the 2020-2021 fiscal year only, this subsection does not apply. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00334'25 a) or House Bill No. 5348 (request no. H00334'25 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.